Utah statutes.
76-8-406.   Obstructing collection of revenue.

Every person who willfully obstructs or hinders any public officer from collecting any revenue, taxes, or other sums of money in which the people of this state are interested, and which such officer is by law empowered to collect, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

